New York, session 2025-2026, A10307.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 228 of the execu- 2 tive law, as added by chapter 371 of the laws of 2022, is amended and a 3 new subdivision 2-a is added to read as follows: 4 (a) The division shall report the name, date of birth and physical 5 description of any person prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant 6 to 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(g) or (n), and the reason for any denial, to the 7 national instant criminal background check system index, denied persons 8 files. 9 2-a. (a) Within two business days of making the report described in 10 paragraph (a) of subdivision two of this section, the division shall 11 report the name, date of birth, physical description, and the reason for 12 the denial to: 13 i. the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the 14 location where the prohibited person sought to acquire the firearm; and 15 ii. the local prosecutor having jurisdiction over the location wherein 16 the prohibited person sought to acquire the firearm. 17 (b) The local law enforcement agency shall initiate a criminal inves- 18 tigation within five business days of receiving such report from the 19 division. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 21 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14853-07-6